Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1108.
do enact as follows:SB1108,11Section 1. 49.45 (30t) of the statutes is created to read:SB1108,2,2249.45 (30t) Doula services. (a) In this subsection:SB1108,2,431. “Certified doula” means an individual who has received certification from a 4doula certifying organization recognized by the department.SB1108,2,752. “Doula services” means childbirth education and support services, 6including emotional and physical support, provided during pregnancy, labor, birth, 7and the postpartum period.SB1108,2,148(b) The department shall request from the secretary of the federal 9department of health and human services any required waiver of federal law 10relating to Medical Assistance or required amendment to the state plan for Medical 11Assistance to allow reimbursement for doula services provided by a certified doula. 12If the waiver or state plan amendment is granted, the department shall reimburse 13a certified doula under s. 49.46 (2) (b) 12p. for the allowable charges for doula 14services provided to Medical Assistance recipients.SB1108,215Section 2. 49.46 (2) (b) 12p. of the statutes is created to read:SB1108,2,171649.46 (2) (b) 12p. Doula services provided by a certified doula, as specified 17under s. 49.45 (30t).SB1108,318Section 3. 253.087 of the statutes is created to read:SB1108,3,11253.087 Doulas in hospitals and birthing centers. (1) In this section:SB1108,3,32(a) “Birthing center” means a facility that is not part of a hospital and that 3provides maternity care that does not require hospitalization.SB1108,3,44(b) “Hospital” has the meaning given in s. 50.33 (2).SB1108,3,65(c) “Medical Assistance–certified doula” means a doula who is certified by the 6department under s. 49.45 (2) (a) 11. a.SB1108,3,137(2) By no later than the first day of the 7th month beginning after the effective 8date of this subsection .... [LRB inserts date], each hospital and each birthing center 9shall adopt and maintain written policies and procedures to permit a patient who is 10a Medical Assistance recipient to have a Medical Assistance–certified doula of the 11patient’s choice accompany the patient within the hospital’s or birthing center’s 12premises for the purposes of providing support before, during, and after labor and 13childbirth.SB1108,3,1814(3) A hospital or birthing center may not count against the hospital’s or 15birthing center’s quota for support persons or guests who may accompany patients 16a Medical Assistance–certified doula who accompanies a patient who is a Medical 17Assistance recipient within the hospital’s or birthing center’s premises for the 18purposes of providing support before, during, and after labor and childbirth.SB1108,3,2219(4) A hospital or birthing center shall publish on its website a summary of the 20hospital’s or birthing center’s policies and procedures under sub. (2) and contact 21information to facilitate communications between the hospital or birthing center 22and Medical Assistance–certified doulas and doula organizations.SB1108,4,223(5) Notwithstanding sub. (2), a Medical Assistance–certified doula may not 1have access to a patient who is a Medical Assistance recipient when that access is 2inconsistent with generally accepted medical standards or practices.SB1108,4,93(6) A hospital is not liable for any act or omission resulting from the provision 4of services by a Medical Assistance–certified doula solely on the basis that the 5hospital permitted a patient who is a Medical Assistance recipient to have the 6Medical Assistance–certified doula of the patient’s choice accompany the patient 7within the hospital’s or birthing center’s premises for the purposes of providing 8support before, during, or after labor and childbirth. A hospital and a Medical 9Assistance–certified doula shall be held liable for their own acts or omissions.SB1108,4,1210(7) At the request of a hospital or birthing center, a Medical 11Assistance–certified doula shall provide written acknowledgement of their 12certification by the department under s. 49.45 (2) (a) 11. a. SB1108,4,1313